Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1047.
do enact as follows:AB1047,14Section 1. 59.692 (1n) (c) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1047,2,8159.692 (1n) (c) 1. Except as provided in subd. 1m. or 2., if the closest principal 2structure in each direction along the shoreline to a proposed principal structure 3exists on an adjacent lot and within 200 feet of the proposed principal structure and 4both of the existing principal structures are set back more than 75 feet from the 5ordinary high-water mark at or farther landward from the setback that was 6required at the time each structure was built, a county shoreland zoning ordinance 7may establish a setback equal to the average of the setbacks required for those 8structures at the time they were built.AB1047,29Section 2. 59.692 (1n) (c) 1m. of the statutes is created to read:AB1047,2,161059.692 (1n) (c) 1m. Except as provided in subd. 2., on a parcel located in 11Waukesha County, if the closest principal structure in each direction along the 12shoreline to a proposed principal structure exists within 250 feet of the proposed 13principal structure and both of the existing principal structures are set back more 14than 75 feet from the ordinary high-water mark, a county shoreland zoning 15ordinance shall establish a setback equal to the average of the setbacks required for 16those structures at the time they were built.AB1047,317Section 3. 59.692 (1n) (c) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1047,2,201859.692 (1n) (c) 2. Subdivision 1. does Subdivisions 1. and 1m. do not apply if 19the resulting setback limits the placement of the proposed principal structure to an 20area on which the structure cannot be built.AB1047,2,2121